Hawaii statutes.
[§168-6] Development period. The board
of agriculture shall fix a development period for a project authorized by this
chapter not to exceed ten years from and including the first calendar year in
which water is first delivered for the lands in the project. During the
development period the board shall annually fix the tolls to be charged for
water use and for acreage service charges, so that the cost of operation and
maintenance of the project during the development period plus any amounts
reimbursable to the State under section 168-3 will be returned over the full
development period. [L 1987, c 306, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next